Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2310.01
Locator, defined.

Locator means a person who identifies and marks underground facilities for an operator, including a contractor who performs such location services for an operator.

Laws 2019, LB462, § 4.